Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 1

Pawnbroker Restitution Act

45-6-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Pawnbroker Restitution Act”.

Acts 2016, ch. 862, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 862, § 1 enacted a new part 3, §§45-6-301 —45-6-303, but the part has been redesignated as part 1, §§45-6-101 —45-6-103, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§45-6-101 —45-6-120 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 15; 1927, ch. 76, §§ 2, 6; Code 1932, §§ 4001, 6747, 6749; Acts 1937, ch. 1985, §§ 1-16, 18-20; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6750.1-6750.18, Williams, §§ 6747, 6749, 6750.10-6750.17, 6750.19-6750.21; Shan., § 2356; Acts 1972, ch. 531, § 1; 1984, ch. 673, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 45-2201 — 45-2220), containing general provisions concerning pawnbrokers, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 22. For provisions concerning pawnbrokers, see part 2 of this chapter.

45-6-102. Crediting money paid by conveying customer if goods are misappropriated or stolen.

Notwithstanding §40-24-105, all moneys paid by a conveying customer pursuant to §45-6-213(c), §40-35-301, or §40-35-304, or pursuant to an order by any court of this state, whether civil or criminal in nature, shall be credited as follows:

If the misappropriated or stolen goods are returned to the claimant of the property, the pawnbroker shall first receive payment until the full amount the conveying customer received from the pawnbroker for the property, plus all applicable pawn service charges, and all fees and costs incurred by the pawnbroker in defending a replevin action or civil matter, are paid. Only after the pawnbroker is repaid in full shall payments be credited toward litigation taxes, costs, fines, or any other payment specified by the court; or

If the misappropriated or stolen goods are not returned to the claimant of the property, the claimant shall first receive payment in an amount specified by the court. After the claimant receives payment in full, all other payments shall be made in accordance with subdivision (1).

Acts 2016, ch. 862, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 862, § 1 enacted a new part 3, §§45-6-301 —45-6-303, but the part has been redesignated as part 1, §§45-6-101 —45-6-103, by authority of the Code Commission.

45-6-103. Relinquishment of item believed misappropriated or stolen.

A pawnbroker shall not be required to relinquish to a claimant an item believed to be misappropriated or stolen unless a court has ordered the pawnbroker to do so; provided, that the pawnbroker shall be subject to any hold order issued pursuant to §45-6-213.

Acts 2016, ch. 862, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 862, § 1 enacted a new part 3, §§45-6-301 —45-6-303, but the part has been redesignated as part 1, §§45-6-101 —45-6-103, by authority of the Code Commission.